Wyoming, session 2025, HB0297.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

[WILDFIRE SUPPRESSION, RESTORATION AND REHABILITATION
FUNDING]

Section 1.

HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
(a) There is appropriated from the general fund for
the purpose of restoring funds expended by the state of
Wyoming to suppress wildfires that occurred in calendar
year 2024 the following amounts for the following programs
or purposes:

(i) One million dollars ($1,000,000.00) for the
special contingency division of the office of the governor,
unit 0601;

(ii) One million two hundred sixty-three
thousand nine hundred sixty-six dollars ($1,263,966.00) for
the disaster contingency unit within the homeland security
division of the office of the governor, unit 1106;

(iii) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00) to
the emergency fire suppression account within the office of
state lands and investments.

(b) There is appropriated from the general fund up to
twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00), or as much thereof
as is necessary, to be deposited by the state auditor in
the legislative stabilization reserve account for repayment
HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
of funds borrowed on or before June 30, 2025 from the
legislative stabilization reserve account under 2024
Wyoming session laws, chapter 118, section 301(b).

(c) There is appropriated from the general fund the
amounts specified in this subsection to the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust income account for
mitigation and restoration projects needed as a result of
the wildfires that occurred within the state of Wyoming in
calendar year 2024. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-15-103(b),
amounts appropriated in this subsection and subsection (h)
of this section shall not be subject to the grant process
or other requirements specified in the Wyoming Wildlife and
Natural Resource Funding Act. Following review and
recommendation by the steering committee created in
subsection (d) of this section, the following amounts shall
be expended for grants and expenditures approved by the
executive director of the Wyoming wildlife and natural
resource trust account board:

(i) One hundred million dollars
($100,000,000.00) for purposes of restoring grass and
vegetation destroyed by wildfires on private and state
HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
lands, preventing the establishment of nonnative invasive
terrestrial vegetation on private and state lands affected
by wildfires, replacing and restoring habitats destroyed by
wildfires on private and state lands and restoring lost
public infrastructure;

(ii) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) for
projects to repair or replace watershed habitat and
facilities for municipal, community and county water
supplies.

(d) There is created a steering committee to consist
of the following members:

(i) Members of the legislature as follows:

(A) One (1) member of the Wyoming house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house;

(B) One (1) member of the Wyoming senate,
appointed by the president of the senate.

HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
(ii) The executive director of the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust account board, who
shall be the chairman of the steering committee;

(iii) Not to exceed six (6) members appointed by
the governor representing or having expertise in, but not
limited to, the following:

(A) The Wyoming office of the governor;

(B) The Wyoming game and fish department;

(C) The weed and pest division of the
Wyoming department of agriculture;

(D) The agricultural extension services of
the University of Wyoming;

(E) Wyoming county commissioners;

(F) The agricultural industry.

HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
(e) The steering committee created in subsection (d)
of this section shall:

(i) Establish a process to accept and review
applications for grants and expenditures from funds
appropriated in subsection (c) of this section;

(ii) Develop grant and expenditure eligibility
criteria for receipt of funds appropriated in subsection
(c) of this section; and

(iii) Make recommendations for grants and
expenditures from funds appropriated in subsections (c) of
this section.

(f) Any proposed grant or expenditure of funds
appropriated in subsection (c) in this section shall be
subject to the following requirements:

(i) The proposed grant or expenditure shall be
reviewed by the attorney general, who shall determine
whether the grant or expenditure provides a substantial
public benefit and constitutes a lawful use of funds; and
HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600

(ii) The executive director of the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust account board may
impose conditions on his approval of any grant or
expenditure, including a requirement for consideration from
the recipient or beneficiary thereof.

(g) There is appropriated twelve thousand five
hundred dollars ($12,500.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for purposes of providing
salary, mileage and per diem to the legislative members of
the steering committee appointed under subsection (d) of
this section. Payments shall be made in the manner and
amount provided by W.S. 28-5-101 for conducting official
business of the steering committee.

(h) From amounts appropriated under subsection (c) of
this section, there shall be paid per diem and mileage to
the non-legislative members and nonstate employee members
of the steering committee appointed under subsection (d) of
this section. Payments shall be made in the amount provided
for members of the legislature by W.S. 28-5-101 for
conducting the official business of the steering committee.
HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
The members of the steering committee representing Wyoming
state government shall be considered to be acting within
the scope of regular employment when conducting the
official business of the steering committee and shall
receive their regular pay without additional compensation.

(j) The steering committee shall terminate on
December 31, 2026.

(k) The executive director of the Wyoming wildlife
and natural resource trust account board shall, not later
than October 1, 2025 and each October 1 thereafter until
the funds appropriated in subsection (c) of this section
are fully expended, report to the joint agriculture, state
and public lands and water resources interim committee and
the joint appropriations committee on the expenditure,
encumbrances, obligations, recipients, purposes and
justifications for all grants and expenditures from funds
appropriated in subsection (c) of this section.

(m) Funds appropriated in this section shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, any
HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
unexpended, unobligated funds appropriated in this section
shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2027.

[TRANSFERS – WILDFIRE SUPPRESSION, RESTORATION AND
REHABILITATION]

Section 2. The state auditor shall transfer one
hundred sixty-two million two hundred seventy-six thousand
four hundred sixty-six dollars ($162,276,466.00) from the
legislative stabilization reserve account to the general
fund for purposes of this act.

[BORROWING AUTHORITY – WILDFIRE SUPPRESSION]

Section 3. For the period beginning July 1, 2025 and
ending June 30, 2026, the governor is authorized to borrow
from the legislative stabilization reserve account up to
thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00) as necessary to
meet funding requirements to fight wildfires in the event
the reserves in the office of state lands and investments'
forestry division have been exhausted. The governor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee, the president
of the senate and the speaker of the house of
HB0297

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0600
representatives immediately upon exercise of this
authority.

[REPEAL]

Section 4. 2024 Wyoming session laws, chapter 118,
section 301(b) is repealed.

[EFFECTIVE DATES]

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective July
1, 2025.

(END)
HB0297